South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3998.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 61-6-1600(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) A nonprofit organization which is licensed by the department pursuant to the provisions of this article may sell alcoholic liquors by the drink. A member or, guest of a member, of a nonprofit organization or other invitee on the nonprofit licensed premises may consume alcoholic liquors sold by the drink upon the premises between the hours of ten o'clock in the morning and two o'clock the following morning. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----